Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3560
Hospital districts; bonds; contents.

The bonds shall specify on their face the date, amount, purpose for which issued, time they shall run, and rate of interest. The bonds shall be printed on good paper, with coupons attached for each year's or half year's interest, and the amount of each year's interest shall be placed on corresponding coupons until such bonds shall become due, in such manner that the last coupon shall fall due at the same time as the bonds. The bonds and coupons thereto attached shall be severally signed by the president and secretary of the board of directors. The bonds and interest shall be payable at the office of the county treasurer in the county in which the district is located and if the district is located in more than one county, at the office of the county treasurer as may be provided in the history of the district and in the bonds.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 7, p. 353;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.55.